District of Columbia statutes.
38-306

Proof of residency.

All students enrolled in District of Columbia public schools and public charter schools funded by the District of Columbia or a student for whom educational services are paid by the District of Columbia shall provide proof of residency in the District or pay tuition pursuant to § 38-302. A determination of residency status shall be made annually for each such student. The methods used to determine residency status shall be consistent across District of Columbia public schools and public charter schools and shall be crafted to facilitate rather than hinder school enrollment of eligible students.

History

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 86-725, § 9
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 4012(c), 51 DCR 8441
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 4012(a), 55 DCR 7598

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-219 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “All students enrolled in District of Columbia public schools and public charter schools must provide proof of residency in the District or pay tuition pursuant to § 38-302. A determination of residency status shall be made annually for each student. The methods used to determine residency status shall be consistent across District of Columbia public schools and public charter schools and shall be crafted to facilitate rather than hinder school enrollment of eligible students.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4012(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4012(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Short Title

Short title: Section 4011 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle F of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Residency Verification Amendment Act of 2008”.

Editor's Notes

Former § 38-306 has been recodified as § 38-305.